Missouri, session 2026, HB2759.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 227.101, to read as follows:
227.101. 1. The commission shall publish on the department of transportation's
official public website its cost estimate and project completion date for any construction,
maintenance, or repair work on the state highway system at the time a contract for the
work is awarded.
2. Upon action by the state highways and transportation commission on bids for
transportation improvements in a letting, the department of transportation shall
publish on the department's website within one business day the engineer's cost estimate
and projected completion date for every project in that letting, whether awarded or
rejected.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.